Utah statutes.
23-13-18.   Use of a computer or other device to remotely hunt wildlife prohibited.

(1)  A person may not use a computer or other device to remotely control the aiming and discharge of a firearm or other weapon for hunting an animal.

(2)  A person who violates Subsection (1) is guilty of a class A misdemeanor.

